Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2004
Degradable, defined.

Degradable shall mean capable of decomposing or deteriorating through a natural chemical process into harmless components after exposure to natural elements for not more than one year.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 4.